Massachusetts, session 194th, H5098.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the city of Salem may grant an additional license for the sale of all
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises under section 12 of said chapter 138 to Gulu-
Gulu Cafe located at 247 Essex Street. The license shall be subject to all of said chapter 138
except section 17.
(b) A license granted pursuant to this section shall only be exercised in the dining room
of a common victualler and other such public rooms or areas as may be deemed reasonable and
appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing.
(c) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of the license granted pursuant
to this section to any other location but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue
and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in
of 3

good standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have
been paid.
(d) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew the license granted pursuant to this section or
any such license is revoked, cancelled or no longer in use, the license shall be returned
physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the
licensing authority which may, within 3 years of such return, then grant the license to a new
applicant at the same location under the same conditions as specified in this act, otherwise such
license shall dissolve.
(e) The license granted pursuant to this section shall be issued within 1 year after the
effective date of this act; provided, however, that a license that is originally granted within that
time period may be granted to a new applicant under subsections (c) and (d) thereafter.
SECTION 2. Upon issuance of the license authorized in section 1, the licensee shall
return physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the
licensing authority, its license for the sale of wines and malt beverages and for the sale of
cordials and liqueurs to be drunk on the premises pursuant to chapter 67 of the acts of 2008.
SECTION 3. (a) The city of Salem may charge a fee for the conversion of the license
described in sections 1 and 2 which shall be paid by the current licensee on the effective date of
this act unless the licensing authority agrees to enter into a contract with the licensee to allow the
division of the fee into multiple payments over time from the licensee; provided, however, that if
the city elects to accept multiple payments over time from the licensee, the option shall be made
available, upon request, to all qualified applicants for a license.
of 3

(b) A fee collected by the city of Salem for the license converted pursuant to this act that
is greater than the amount of the fee charged for an annual renewal of a similar license issued by
the licensing authority shall be deposited into the city of Salem’s economic development account
and expended by the city in a manner consistent with the purpose of such account.
SECTION 4. Chapter 67 of the acts of 2008 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 5. Section 4 shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise specified, this act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3